Florida, session 2026, HB431.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraphs (f) and (i) of subsection (3) of
section 489.105, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
489.105 Definitions.—As used in this part:
(3) "Contractor" means the person who is qualified for,
and is only responsible for, the project contracted for and
means, except as exempted in this part, the person who, for
compensation, undertakes to, submits a bid to, or does himself
or herself or by others construct, repair, alter, remodel, add
to, demolish, subtract from, or improve any building or
structure, including related improvements to real estate, for
others or for resale to others; and whose job scope is
substantially similar to the job scope described in one of the
paragraphs of this subsection. For the purposes of regulation
under this part, the term "demolish" applies only to demolition
of steel tanks more than 50 feet in height; towers more than 50
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb431-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 431 2026
feet in height; other structures more than 50 feet in height;
and all buildings or residences. Contractors are subdivided into
two divisions, Division I, consisting of those contractors
defined in paragraphs (a)-(c), and Division II, consisting of
those contractors defined in paragraphs (d)-(q):
(f) "Class A air-conditioning contractor" means a
contractor whose services are unlimited in the execution of
contracts requiring the experience, knowledge, and skill to:
1. Install, maintain, repair, fabricate, alter, extend, or
design, if not prohibited by law, central air-conditioning,
refrigeration, heating, and ventilating systems, including duct
work in connection with a complete system if such duct work is
performed by the contractor as necessary to complete an air-
distribution system, boiler and unfired pressure vessel systems,
and all appurtenances, apparatus, or equipment used in
connection therewith, and any duct cleaning and equipment
sanitizing that requires at least a partial disassembling of the
system.; to
2. Install, maintain, repair, fabricate, alter, extend, or
design, if not prohibited by law, piping, insulation of pipes,
vessels and ducts, pressure and process piping, and pneumatic
control piping.; to
3. Replace, disconnect, or reconnect power wiring on the
line or load side of the dedicated existing electrical
disconnect switch on single phase electrical systems.; to
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb431-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 431 2026
4. Repair or replace power wiring, disconnects, breakers,
or fuses for dedicated HVAC circuits with proper use of a
circuit breaker lock.; to
5. Install, disconnect, and reconnect low voltage heating,
ventilating, and air-conditioning control wiring.; and to
6. Install a condensate drain from an air-conditioning
unit to an existing safe waste or other approved disposal other
than a direct connection to a sanitary system.
7. Replace and repair existing package pool heaters and
connect replacement package pool heaters to existing pool
piping. The replacement of an existing package pool heater must
use the same make and model as the existing package pool heater.
This includes maintaining the flow rate, connection points, and
heater specifications without modifications to existing pool
piping or system components. The replacement or repair of an
existing package pool heater does not include alterations to the
pool's hydraulic system, the addition of bypass valves, the
installation of new plumbing, the rerouting of pipes, any
changes to the pool's circulation system, or any other
modifications beyond what is necessary to disconnect and
reconnect the unit to the existing piping.
8. Perform The scope of work for such contractor also
includes any excavation work incidental to work performed in
subparagraphs 1.-7., but not thereto, but does not include any
work such as liquefied petroleum or natural gas fuel lines
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb431-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 431 2026
within buildings, except for disconnecting or reconnecting
changeouts of liquefied petroleum or natural gas appliances
within buildings; potable water lines or connections thereto;
sanitary sewer lines; swimming pool piping and filters; or
electrical power wiring.
9. A Class A air-conditioning contractor may Test and
evaluate central air-conditioning, refrigeration, heating, and
ventilating systems, including duct work; however, a mandatory
licensing requirement is not established for the performance of
these specific services.
(i) "Mechanical contractor" means a contractor whose
services are unlimited in the execution of contracts requiring
the experience, knowledge, and skill to:
1. Install, maintain, repair, fabricate, alter, extend, or
design, if not prohibited by law, central air-conditioning,
refrigeration, heating, and ventilating systems, including duct
work in connection with a complete system if such duct work is
performed by the contractor as necessary to complete an air-
distribution system, boiler and unfired pressure vessel systems,
lift station equipment and piping, and all appurtenances,
apparatus, or equipment used in connection therewith, and any
duct cleaning and equipment sanitizing that requires at least a
partial disassembling of the system.; to
2. Install, maintain, repair, fabricate, alter, extend, or
100 design, if not prohibited by law, piping, insulation of pipes,
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb431-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 431 2026
101 vessels and ducts, pressure and process piping, pneumatic
102 control piping, gasoline tanks and pump installations and piping
103 for same, standpipes, air piping, vacuum line piping, oxygen
104 lines, nitrous oxide piping, ink and chemical lines, fuel
105 transmission lines, liquefied petroleum gas lines within
106 buildings, and natural gas fuel lines within buildings.; to
107 3. Replace, disconnect, or reconnect power wiring on the
108 line or load side of the dedicated existing electrical
109 disconnect switch on single phase electrical systems.; to
110 4. Repair or replace power wiring, disconnects, breakers,
111 or fuses for dedicated HVAC circuits with proper use of a
112 circuit breaker lock.; to
113 5. Install, disconnect, and reconnect low voltage heating,
114 ventilating, and air-conditioning control wiring.; and to
115 6. Install a condensate drain from an air-conditioning
116 unit to an existing safe waste or other approved disposal other
117 than a direct connection to a sanitary system.
118 7. Replace and repair existing package pool heaters and
119 connect replacement package pool heaters to existing pool
120 piping. The replacement of an existing package pool heater must
121 use the same make and model as the existing package pool heater.
122 This includes maintaining the flow rate, connection points, and
123 heater specifications without modifications to existing pool
124 piping or system components. The replacement or repair of an
125 existing package pool heater does not include alterations to the
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb431-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 431 2026
126 pool's hydraulic system, the addition of bypass valves, the
127 installation of new plumbing, the rerouting of pipes, any
128 changes to the pool's circulation system, or any other
129 modifications beyond what is necessary to disconnect and
130 reconnect the unit to the existing piping.
131 8. Perform The scope of work for such contractor also
132 includes any excavation work incidental to work performed in
133 subparagraphs 1.-7., but not thereto, but does not include any
134 work such as potable water lines or connections thereto,
135 sanitary sewer lines, swimming pool piping and filters, or
136 electrical power wiring.
137 9. A mechanical contractor may Test and evaluate central
138 air-conditioning, refrigeration, heating, and ventilating
139 systems, including duct work; however, a mandatory licensing
140 requirement is not established for the performance of these
141 specific services.
142 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
143
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb431-00